Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 2. Regulation of Recipient Eligibility.

§ 32.1-321.1.
Powers and duties of Department.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall have the following powers and duties:

To investigate and refer for prosecution violations of applicable state and federal laws and regulations pertaining to the application for and receipt of services or benefits;

To investigate and refer for civil recovery any debts owed to the medical assistance program or funds paid for services or benefits as a result of violations of applicable state and federal laws and regulations pertaining to the application for and receipt of services or benefits; and

To cooperate with the federal government, other state agencies and the State Attorney General’s Office in the detection and deterrence of fraud by recipients of medical assistance or their agents.

History.

1986, c. 551.

§ 32.1-321.2.
Liability for excess benefits or payments obtained without intent to violate this article; recovery of Medical Assistance erroneously paid.

Any person who, without intent to violate this article, obtains benefits or payments under medical assistance to which he is not entitled shall be liable for any excess benefits or payments received. If the recipient knew or reasonably should have known that he was not entitled to the excess benefits, he may also be liable for interest on the amount of the excess benefits or payments at the judgment rate as defined in §

6.2-302

from the date upon which such person knew or reasonably should have known that he had received excess benefits or payments to the date on which repayment is made to the Commonwealth. No person shall be liable for payment of interest, however, when excess benefits or payments were obtained as a result of errors made solely by the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

Any payment erroneously made on behalf of a recipient or former recipient of medical assistance may be recovered by the Department of Medical Assistance Services from the recipient or the recipient’s income, assets or estate unless such property is otherwise exempted by state or federal law or regulation.

History.

1986, c. 551.

Editor’s note.

Effective October 1, 2010, “§

6.2-302

” was substituted for “§ 6.1-330.54” to conform to the recodification of Title 6.1 by Acts 2010, c. 794.

§ 32.1-321.3.
Fraudulently obtaining benefits; liability for fraudulently issued benefits; civil action to recover; penalty.

Any person who, on behalf of himself or another, issues, obtains or attempts to obtain medical assistance benefits by means of (i) knowingly and willfully making or causing to be made any false statement or false representation of material fact; (ii) knowingly and willfully concealing or causing to be concealed a material fact; or (iii) engaging in any other fraudulent scheme or device shall be liable for repayment of the cost of all benefits issued as a result of such fraud, plus interest on the amount of the benefits issued at the rate of 1.5 percent per month for the period from the date upon which payment was made for such benefits to the date on which repayment is made to the Commonwealth.

Such matters may be referred for criminal action to the attorney for the Commonwealth having jurisdiction over the case. The Attorney General may, independent of any referral to or decision of the attorney for the Commonwealth, petition the circuit court in the jurisdiction of the alleged offense to seek an order assessing civil penalties in the amount of the benefits issued, in addition to repayment and interest and any other penalties provided by law.

All civil penalties shall be deposited in the general fund of the state treasury upon receipt.

History.

1986, c. 551; 1996, cc. 941, 991; 2010, c. 305.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 305, cl. 2 provides: “That the Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall investigate options for a comprehensive system that utilizes external records search and analytic technologies for the collection and review of data from public and private sources, including (i) data used to confirm the identity and eligibility of medical assistance services benefit recipients, (ii) data related to provider eligibility including information about providers’ criminal history or sanctions against providers in other states, and (iii) data about prepayment and postpayment claims, to detect, prevent and investigate fraud, waste and abuse in Virginia’s medical assistance services program, including but not limited to fraud, waste, and abuse in the areas of provider enrollment, claims processing, and audits and investigations, and shall report information related to such options, including cost, to the General Assembly no later than December 1, 2010.”

Acts 2010, c. 305, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act pertaining to termination or refusal to enter into or renew Medicaid provider contracts to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 305, in the first paragraph, rewrote clause (i), which formerly read: “willful false statement,” rewrote clause (ii), which formerly read: “willful misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact,” inserted “engaging in” at the beginning of clause (iii), and made related and stylistic changes.

§ 32.1-321.4.
False statement or representation in applications for eligibility or for use in determining rights to benefits; concealment of facts; criminal penalty.

Any person who engages in the following activities, on behalf of himself or another, shall be guilty of larceny and, in addition to the penalties provided in §§

18.2-95

and

18.2-96

as applicable, may be fined an amount not to exceed $10,000:

Knowingly and willfully making or causing to be made any false statement or misrepresentation of a material fact in an application for eligibility, benefits or payments under medical assistance;

Knowingly and willfully falsifying, concealing or covering up by any trick, scheme, or device a material fact or causing a material fact to be falsified, concealed, or covered up in such a manner, in connection with an application for eligibility, benefits or payments;

Knowingly and willfully concealing or failing to disclose any event affecting the initial or continued right of any individual to any benefits or payment or causing such concealment or failure to disclose such an event with an intent to secure fraudulently such benefits or payment in a greater amount or quantity than is authorized or when no such benefit or payment is authorized;

Knowingly and willfully converting or causing to be converted any benefits or payment received pursuant to an application for another person and receipt of benefits or payment on behalf of such other person to use other than for the health and welfare of the other person; or

Knowingly and willfully failing to notify or causing another to fail to notify the local department of social services, through whom medical assistance benefits were obtained, of changes in the circumstances of any recipient or applicant which could result in the reduction or termination of medical assistance services.

It shall be the duty of the Director of Medical Assistance Services or his designee to enforce the provisions of this section. A warrant or summons may be issued for violations of which the Director or his designee has knowledge. Trial for violation of this section shall be held in the county or city in which the application for medical assistance was made or obtained.

History.

1986, c. 551; 2002, c. 747; 2010, c. 305.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 305, cl. 2 provides: “That the Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall investigate options for a comprehensive system that utilizes external records search and analytic technologies for the collection and review of data from public and private sources, including (i) data used to confirm the identity and eligibility of medical assistance services benefit recipients, (ii) data related to provider eligibility including information about providers’ criminal history or sanctions against providers in other states, and (iii) data about prepayment and postpayment claims, to detect, prevent and investigate fraud, waste and abuse in Virginia’s medical assistance services program, including but not limited to fraud, waste, and abuse in the areas of provider enrollment, claims processing, and audits and investigations, and shall report information related to such options, including cost, to the General Assembly no later than December 1, 2010.”

Acts 2010, c. 305, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act pertaining to termination or refusal to enter into or renew Medicaid provider contracts to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, deleted “welfare or” preceding “social services” in subdivision A 5.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 305, in subdivision A 2, inserted “or causing a material fact to be falsified, concealed, or covered up in such a manner”; in subdivision A 3, inserted “or causing such concealment or failure to disclose such an event”; in subdivision A 4, inserted “or causing to be converted”; and in subdivision A 5, inserted “or causing another to fail to notify.”

§ 32.1-322.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

32.1-322

, pertaining to severability, derived from 1981, c. 255.